Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.170

Financial statements—Monthly—Annual.

The commission shall each month print in pamphlet form a detailed itemized statement of all receipts and expenses of the city and a summary of its proceedings during the preceding month and furnish copies thereof to the state library, the city library, the newspapers of the city, and to persons who apply therefor at the office of the city clerk. At the end of each year the commission shall cause a complete examination of all the books and accounts of the city to be made by competent accountants and shall publish the result of such examination to be made in the manner above provided for publication of statements of monthly expenditures.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.170. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 18; RRS s 9107.]